ess.lexc
-@₁~fyuneghtu[V→V]:@₁~fyuneghtu               VerbMoodInfl; ! to love to V
-@₁~fyuwhaagh[V→V]:@₁~fyuwhaagh               VerbMoodInfl; ! to first V; to V in the beginning
@R.VALENCE.TRNS@-~i[V→V]:@R.VALENCE.TRNS@~i   VerbMoodInfl; ! to V something; to suffer something's V-ing
-@~–(g)kaayagh[V→V]:@~–(g)kaayagh             VerbMoodInfl; ! to have V-ed fruitlessly; to have V-ed in vain; to have V-ed but. ...
-@~–(g)kau[V→V]:@~–(g)kau                     VerbMoodInfl; ! to have V-ed; to have been V-ed.
-@~–(g)kaqe[V→V]:@~–(g)kaqe                   VerbMoodInfl; ! to have V-ed (him/it) 
-@~–(g)kaqsagh[V→V]:@~–(g)kaqsagh             VerbMoodInfl; ! to have V-ed fruitlessly; to have V-ed in vain; to have V-ed but. ...
-@~–(g)kayugu[V→V]:@~–(g)kayugu               VerbMoodInfl; ! to be able to V; can V
-@~–(g)kayugughte[V→V]:@~–(g)kayugughte       VerbMoodInfl; ! to become able to V

-@₁@₂~fmiqe[Cmpd_Vbl]:@₁@₂~fmiqe          VerbMoodInfl; ! to compel one to V; to make one V
-@₁~fnayuke[Cmpd_Vbl]:@₁~fnayuke          VerbMoodInfl; ! to think that one might V
-@₁~fni[Cmpd_Vbl]:@₁~fni                  VerbMoodInfl; ! to say that one is V-ing or being V-ed; to think that one is V-ing or being V-ed
-@₁~fyuke[Cmpd_Vbl]:@₁~fyuke              VerbMoodInfl; ! to think that one is V-ing or has V-ed
-saghagh[Cmpd_Vbl]:saghagh                VerbMoodInfl; ! to try to induce one to V
-~sf%:(e)sqe[Cmpd_Vbl]:~sf%:(e)sqe        VerbMoodInfl; ! to ask one to V; to tell one to V
-(te)sigate[Cmpd_Vbl]:(te)sigate          VerbMoodInfl; ! to prevent or keep one from V-ing; to not allow one to V; to not let one V
-(te)snaanghite[Cmpd_Vbl]:(te)snaanghite  VerbMoodInfl; ! to tell one not to V in the future; to forbid one from V-ing in the future
-(te)snanigh[Cmpd_Vbl]:(te)snanigh        VerbMoodInfl; ! to tell not to V; to forbid one to V
-(te)ste[Cmpd_Vbl]:(te)ste                VerbMoodInfl; ! to cause one to V; to allow one to V; to make one V; to let one V; to have one V
-(te)stepag[Cmpd_Vbl]:(te)stepag          VerbMoodInfl; ! to cause or allow one to V too much
-(te)sug[Cmpd_Vbl]:(te)sug                VerbMoodInfl; ! to want one to V

-@₁~%:(i/u)ma[V→N]:@₁~%:(i/u)ma               NounInfl; ! one who V-s
-@₁~%:(i/u)mate[V→N]:@₁~%:(i/u)mate           NounInfl; ! the time while V-ing; the course of V-ing
-@₁~%:(i/u)manginagh[V→N]:@₁~%:(i/u)manginagh NounInfl; ! V-ing every time; V-ing the whole time
-kagh[V→N]:kagh                               NounInfl; ! raw material for V-ing; something to be V-ed
-@₁–lghii[V→N]:@₁–lghii                       NounInfl; ! the one that V-ed
-–lleghpigagh[V→N]:–lleghpigagh               NounInfl; ! most V one
-–lleghqagh[V→N]:–lleghqagh                   NounInfl; ! future act of V-ing
-–llegh[V→N]:–llegh                           NounInfl; ! one that has V-ed or been V-ed; act of V-ing; activity of V-ing; the one the possessor V-ed; one or ones which are V to the greatest extent; most V one(s); more V one(s)
-–lleg[V→N]:–lleg                             NounInfl; ! one who V-s well; proficient V-er; good V-er
-~fmiigh[V→N]:~fmiigh                         NounInfl; ! thing held by V-ing 
-@₁~fnaqe[V→N]:@₁~fnaqe                       NounInfl; ! one who is going to V
-@₁~f–neghllug[V→N]:@₁~f–neghllug             NounInfl; ! something that is difficult or hard to V; one who hardly needs to V
-@₁~f–negh[V→N]:@₁~f–negh                     NounInfl; ! the act of V-ing; the activity of V-ing; the state of being V
-@₁–negh[V→N]:@₁–negh                         NounInfl; ! the one or ones which are V to the greatest extent
-@₁–nghhagh[V→N]:@₁–nghhagh                   NounInfl; ! one that has recently V-ed
-~%:(ng₁)iitagh[V→N]:~%:(ng₁)iitagh           NounInfl; ! device to prevent V-ing
-@*ngugh*[V→N]:@*ngugh*                       NounInfl; ! one that is V
-~fnigh[V→N]:~fnigh                           NounInfl; ! thing that is good to V
-@₁–nqegtagh[V→N]:@₁–nqegtagh                 NounInfl; ! one that V-s easily; one that V-s readily
-qagh[V→N]:qagh                               NounInfl; ! one that is V
-~–qumtaagh[V→N]:~–qumtaagh                   NounInfl; ! frequently V-ed thing; usually V-ed thing; commonly V-ed thing
-qutagh[N→N]:qutagh                           NounInfl; ! device associated with V-ing
-@₁~f–rakegtagh[V→N]:@₁~f–rakegtagh           NounInfl; ! one that Vs quickly 
-–rkaggagh[V→N]:–rkaggagh                     NounInfl; ! one that is a little bit V; one that is slightly V
-–rkapig[V→N]:–rkapig                         NounInfl; ! one that is very V
-–sag[V→N]:–sag                               NounInfl; ! one who V-s; habitual V-er
-(s)ta[V→N]:(s)ta                             NounInfl; ! habitual V-er; one who V-s as an occupation
-tala[V→N]:tala                               NounInfl; ! the extent of V-ness
-tuqagh[V→N]:tuqagh                           NounInfl; ! one that V-s habitually
-–tuqagh[V→N]:–tuqagh                         NounInfl; ! one that V-s habitually
-@₁~%:(u)sagh[V→N]:@₁~%:(u)sagh               NounInfl; ! something that has been V-ed
-@₁~%:(u)sigh[V→N]:@₁~%:(u)sigh               NounInfl; ! device for V-ing; instrument for V-ing
-@₁~%:(u)ta[V→N]:@₁~%:(u)ta                   NounInfl; ! device for V-ing; instrument for V-ing; condition with respect to V-ing
-@₁~%:(u)te[V→N]:@₁~%:(u)te                   NounInfl; ! condition with respect to V-ing
-@₁~fvig[V→N]:@₁~fvig                         NounInfl; ! place to V; time to V (esp. in month names)
-@₁~fyaghqagh[V→N]:@₁~fyaghqagh               NounInfl; ! something that will V or be V-ed
-@₁~f–yu[V→N]:@₁~f–yu                         NounInfl; ! one who is good at V-ing
-@₁~fyuggaagh[V→N]:@₁~fyuggaagh               NounInfl; ! first one to V
-@₁~f–yuqagh[V→N]:@₁~f–yuqagh                 NounInfl; ! one who is good at V-ing; proficient V-er
-@₁~fyuwhaagh[V→N]:@₁~fyuwhaagh               NounInfl; ! first one to V
@R.VALENCE.TRNS@@P.VALENCE.TRNS@-@~–(g)ke[V→N]:@R.VALENCE.TRNS@@P.VALENCE.TRNS@@~–(g)ke NounInfl; ! the one(s) possessor is V-ing
-@~–(g)kagh[V→N]:@~–(g)kagh                   NounInfl; ! one that has V-ed; one that has been V-ed
-@~–(g)kayug[V→N]:@~–(g)kayug                 NounInfl; ! one that V-s readily; one who is able to V

-–ghllag[AUG]:–ghllag      EncliticOrEnd;
-–ghllaget[AUG]:–ghllaget  EncliticOrEnd;
-–ghllagek[AUG]:–ghllagek  EncliticOrEnd;
-~faagh[AUG]:~faagh        EncliticOrEnd;
-~faaghet[AUG]:~faaghet    EncliticOrEnd;
-~faaghek[AUG]:~faaghek    EncliticOrEnd;



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                                           !!!
!!!            Obsolete Verb -ete-            !!!
!!!   Encountered only in contractions with   !!!
!!!      the localis case ending              !!!
!!!      the 4SG quantifier-qualifier         !!!
!!!                                           !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON AssignValenceVerbEte
@P.VALENCE.INTR@  VerbEte;

LEXICON PosturalRoot
iggag        AssignValenceVerbEte; ! leaning; tilting
